Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
CHAPTER 172 County Law Libraries

172.010.
County public library; establishment of. [Repealed.]

172.020.
County library board. [Repealed.]

172.030.
Certificate of appointment and oath; record of. [Repealed.]

172.040.
Powers and duties of county library board. [Repealed.]

172.050.
Tax levy for county library. [Repealed.]

172.060.
Finance; county library fund; disbursements. [Repealed.]

172.070.
Consolidation with other local libraries. [Repealed.]

172.080.
County tax to support city library when used by county. [Repealed.]

172.090.
Additional members on board; when appointed; terms; qualifications; authority. [Repealed.]

172.095.
Contract with county. [Renumbered.]

172.100.
County law library — Location — Books — On-line legal resources.

A county law library shall be established in each county seat and the fiscal court of each county shall designate sufficient room in the courthouse, in a building of good construction adjacent to the courthouse, in the local public library, or in a building where sessions of the District or Circuit Court are regularly held, or a combination of the foregoing, where such library shall be located and where the books and materials of the library may be safely kept.

The books of the county law library shall consist of all volumes belonging to the state heretofore sent to the various county officials directed by law to receive such books, and all volumes hereafter sent to such library by the state, and all books now owned or hereafter acquired by the county for the library. The counties may provide on-line legal resources and may acquire books, maps, or other articles for the library by purchase, gift, or devise.

History.

2438c-8; 2007, ch. 35, § 1, effective June 26, 2007.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under the provisions of this section and KRS

172.110

the Circuit Court Clerk may take reasonable steps to regulate the use of the county law library.

OAG 72-394

.

A fiscal court may purchase a private law library and office equipment for the county law library pursuant to this section or it may purchase such library and equipment as a purchase for the county attorney’s office out of the excess fees of the succeeding county attorney or out of the county treasury where the fees of that office are insufficient for that purpose under the authority of KRS

64.530

and

67.080

.

OAG 73-433

.

The strict language as to location of the library found in this section is permissive only.

OAG 79-270

.

The establishing of a county law library in the county seat is mandatory.

OAG 82-177

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Books furnished by the state to be public property, KRS

57.360

.

City, county and regional libraries, KRS Ch. 173.

Kentucky historical society, fiscal court may authorize delivery of old books and documents to, KRS

171.340

.

Kentucky Reports, law library of each county entitled to one copy of, KRS

57.320

.

Public books to be stamped property of state, KRS

57.370

.

Session Acts, law library of each county entitled to one copy of, KRS

57.300

.

State library services and archives, KRS Ch. 171.

172.110.
Circuit clerk is librarian — Duties — Salary — Inventory.

The circuit clerk shall be ex officio librarian of the county law library, and he shall see that county and state officials have access to the library at reasonable hours each day except Sunday and holidays. He shall receive a salary of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) per month for his services as librarian.

He shall keep the library rooms in order, preserve, arrange and index all the books, charts, maps and furniture belonging in the library, and see that no books or other things are taken from the library rooms without a receipt being given therefor.

He shall receipt for all books, maps and furniture placed in the library. The receipts shall be given to the state law librarian and preserved in his office at Frankfort.

He shall take an inventory each December of all the books, maps, charts or other property in the library belonging to the state and report the inventory under oath to the state law librarian before January 1 of the following year.

History.

2438c-8; amend. Acts 1954, ch. 42, § 22; 1956, ch. 142.

172.120.
Clerk to give inventories to successor — Receipt to predecessor — Liability for books lost.

Each clerk shall turn over to his successor separate inventories of all books, stationery and other property in the library at the commencement of his term, and all property placed in the library during his term.

Each clerk shall receipt to his predecessor for all books, stationery, and other property in the library at the time he takes charge, and shall be responsible upon his official bond for the value of all books lost from the library during his term of office.

History.

2438c-9.

172.130.
Fiscal court members to be trustees — Appropriations.

The members of the fiscal court shall be trustees of the county law library and shall see that the circuit clerk properly discharges his duties as librarian. The fiscal court may appropriate money out of the county treasury to pay for legal textbooks and decisions of the courts of other states, and to replace decisions of the Court of Justice furnished by the state which have been lost, mutilated or destroyed.

History.

2438c-10; amend. Acts 1976, ch. 62, § 91.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Burned books, replacement of, KRS

57.350

.

172.140.
Use of books — Removal from library — To be returned on request.

Any person may use the books in the library, but the clerk shall not permit anyone to take the books out of the library, except that officials and attorneys-at-law may take the books to courtrooms to be used in the argument of cases there pending but not elsewhere.

Any person who has in his possession any public book belonging to the state shall, upon request of the clerk having custody of the book, return it to the clerk.

History.

2431, 2438c-11.

172.150.
Record of books taken from library — Liability for failure to return book — Action.

The clerk shall keep a record in which he shall charge each book to the person taking it from the library and he shall see that all books so taken are returned at the proper time. If any person fails to return a book taken out by him, he shall be liable for double the cost thereof and the clerk shall move for judgment in the name of the state against such person under the procedure set out in KRS

418.005

to

418.015

and CR 6.03(2). The state may have attachment without bond for all such books.

History.

2438c-12, 2438c-13; amend. Acts 1962, ch. 210, § 24.

172.160.
State university and college libraries — Clerk may give material to.

The circuit clerk as county law librarian may give to the library of the University of Kentucky and to the libraries of the state universities and colleges, such noncurrent documents and reports and other library materials in his possession as are not needed by the county.

History.

2438c-11a.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Kentucky Historical Society, fiscal court may authorize delivery of old books and documents to, KRS

171.340

.

172.170.
County law library.

The provisions of KRS

172.100

to

172.160

shall not apply to any county that has a law library acquired under the provisions of Chapter 2 of the Acts of 1916. The fiscal court of such county may make such rules and regulations regarding the maintenance and operation of the library as the court deems proper and as are approved by the judge or judges of the Circuit Court of the county, and may employ a librarian at a salary not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per month, and pay said salary out of the general funds of the county. The library shall be for the use of the court officers and county officers of the county, and the fiscal court may provide for the use of the library by others than the court and county officers, on such terms as the fiscal court deems advisable and proper.

All books belonging to the state heretofore or hereafter sent to the county officials directed by law to receive such books, all books sent to the library by the state, and all books now owned or hereafter acquired by the county for the library, shall constitute part of the library. The county may acquire books, maps or other articles for the library by purchase, gift or devise.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 168; 2014, ch. 92, § 242, effective January 1, 2015.

172.180.
Alternate method of financing library.

Any county may adopt the following method of financing the cost of operation and maintenance of the county law library, in lieu of the method set out in KRS

172.130

or

172.170

:

Upon petition of three-fourths (3/4) of the duly licensed and practicing attorneys resident in the county addressed to the Circuit Judge of the county, to the effect that they, as officers of the various courts of the county, recognize the need of a more adequate county law library, there being attached to said petition an attested copy of a resolution of the fiscal court of the county indorsing the adoption of this optional method of financing the cost of operation and maintenance of the county law library, the Circuit Judge shall enter an order noting that said optional plan for the financing of the cost of operation and maintenance of the county law library has been adopted.

The order shall set forth the name of each duly licensed and practicing attorney signing said petition, and the order book and page number containing the resolution of the fiscal court.

The order shall direct the following:

That upon receipt of the order by the clerks of said courts there shall be taxed as costs in all criminal actions, except examining trials and felony trials, thereafter instituted in said court the following fee, which shall be designated as county law library fee, in District Court, a sum not to exceed fifty cents ($0.50); in Circuit and District Courts, on all civil actions a sum not to exceed one dollar ($1) excepting, however, in counties containing cities of the first class and counties containing an urban-county government or cities with populations equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census, where the county law library fee, in District Court, shall be a sum not to exceed one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50); in Circuit and District Courts, on all civil actions, a sum not to exceed three dollars ($3); and

That the circuit clerk shall at the end of each month pay all sums collected as county law library fees during the preceding month, to the trustees of the county law library, and the clerk shall make a full report with said payment, and receive a receipt for all payments.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 206, § 1; 1958, ch. 75, § 1; 1960, ch. 17, effective June 16, 1960; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 165, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 295, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 392, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1996, ch. 231, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2014, ch. 92, § 243, effective January 1, 2015.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The library tax cannot be imposed upon a fine paid to a police chief for a parking violation where no court action was involved.

OAG 68-196

.

The trustees of the law library have no authority to expend law library funds for capital improvement or for items constituting realty.

OAG 68-196

.

The county law library fee must be added to the costs in misdemeanor cases handled in city police courts.

OAG 70-119

.

Where the Circuit Court ordered a fee for the county law library to be taxed as costs, the county law library fee must be added to the costs in misdemeanor cases handled by the police court of a second class city.

OAG 70-119

.

It is the responsibility of the Circuit Court Clerk to keep records of books purchased under this section which are placed in the county law library.

OAG 72-394

.

The 50¢ fee authorized by this section is applicable to the city of Paducah and is mandatory.

OAG 72-484

.

172.190.
County law library fund.

Upon adoption of the optional method of financing a county law library provided in KRS

172.180

, the funds derived from the county law library fee shall be designated county law library fund, and said fund shall be under the sole and full control of the trustees of the county law library.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 206, § 2; 1958, ch. 75, § 2, effective June 19, 1958.

172.200.
Appointment of trustees — Powers — Duties — Limits on indebtedness — County not to be liable — Treasurer, duties.

Upon the adoption of this optional plan, in counties other than those containing a city of the first class or consolidated local government, the Circuit Judge shall appoint one (1) member of the county’s bar, and the members of the county’s bar shall, by majority vote, elect another of their number, which two (2) attorneys shall, with the county attorney of the county, constitute and be designated as “Trustees, . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . County Law Library.” In counties containing a city of the first class or consolidated local government, the Chief Circuit Judge shall appoint one (1) member of the county’s bar; the members of the county’s bar shall, by majority vote, elect another of their number; the fiscal court or consolidated local government pursuant to the provisions of KRS

67C.139

shall appoint one (1) member, and one (1) member shall be appointed by the Commonwealth’s attorney, which four (4) attorneys shall, with the county attorney of the county, constitute and be designated as “Trustees, . . . . . County Law Library” or in a county containing a consolidated local government, “Trustees, . . . . . / . . . . . County Law Library,” which shall be a combination of the names of the largest city in existence on the date of the approval of the consolidated local government and the county.

The trustees shall serve for a term of two (2) years or until their successors are elected or qualified.

The trustees shall be in charge of the county law library, and they shall make purchases of the various state and federal case reports, textbooks, legal encyclopedia, and all other books or equipment usually incident to or customarily found in law libraries, or necessary to the protection of the rights of litigants, and they shall cause same to be properly arranged in the county law library or Court of Justice facilities, directing the ex officio librarian in the exercise of his duties. The trustees may also provide on-line legal resources for the use of library patrons.

The trustees shall exercise their absolute discretion in the purchase of books, pamphlets, periodicals, and other materials and equipment, and in the appointment and compensation of personnel to assist the ex officio librarian in the handling of materials and in the maintenance of the library, but the trustees shall not contract for any such purchases and appointments so as to create an indebtedness greater than the anticipated revenue for the following eighteen (18) months, the anticipated revenue being based upon the preceding eighteen (18) months’ revenue, and any indebtedness of the county law library fund shall not be considered in any way an indebtedness of the county, but shall be an indebtedness of the county law library fund only, and all creditors must look only to the county law library fund for satisfaction of their indebtedness.

The trustees shall designate one (1) of their number as treasurer and he shall be accountable for the receipt, deposit, and disbursement of all sums received for the operation of the county law library. He shall be bonded by a corporate bond, the cost of which shall be paid out of the receipts of the library fund. He shall deposit all sums received by him as treasurer in a regular banking depository, and he shall pay for all purchases made by the trustees by check or draft, keeping a true and accurate account of all sums received and expended by him. He shall annually file a written report with the Circuit Judge of the county showing all sums received by him, together with the court from which they were received, and an itemized statement of all expenditures made by him. The treasurer shall turn all funds over to his successor, together with a full inventory of the county law library, and together with a full and complete itemized statement of all outstanding accounts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 206, § 3; 1962, ch. 11, § 1; 1978, ch. 375, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 2002, ch. 346, § 177, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 35, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 20, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

Opinions of Attorney General.

For the initial 18 months of the existence of the library, the trustees can only make expenditures out of available cash receipts.

OAG 68-196

.

The trustees of the law library have no authority to expend law library funds for capital improvement or for items constituting realty.

OAG 68-196

.

172.990.
Penalties.

Any clerk who is delinquent in making the inventory required in subsection (4) of KRS

172.110

shall be fined five dollars ($5) for each month or part of month he is delinquent.

Any person who violates subsection (2) of KRS

172.140

shall, in addition to his civil liability, be fined not exceeding fifty dollars ($50).

Any clerk who knowingly permits any book of the laws of this state or reports of the Court of Justice to be taken from his office in such a manner that he cannot produce the book when called upon to do so, shall be fined not exceeding fifty dollars ($50).

History.

2430, 2431, 2438c-8; amend. Acts 1976, ch. 62, § 92.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Double liability for failure to return book, KRS

172.150

.